District of Columbia statutes.
1-615.57

Posting of notice.

The District shall conspicuously display notices of employee protections and obligations under this subchapter in each personnel office and in other public places, and shall use all other appropriate means to keep all employees informed, including but not limited to the inclusion of annual notices of employee protections and obligations under this subchapter with employee tax reporting documents and in a letter provided to employees upon commencement of employment.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1557
as added Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 102(c), 45 DCR 5147
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 109(c), 47 DCR 520
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-117, § 2(f), 57 DCR 896
1981 Ed., § 1-616.17.
D.C. Law 13-91 validated a previously made technical amendment.
D.C. Law 18-117 substituted “reporting documents and in a letter provided to employees upon commencement of employment” for “reporting documents”.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-615.51.